Utah statutes.
68-3-2.   Statutes in derogation of common law not strictly construed --
Rules of equity prevail.
(1)  The rule of the common law that a statute in derogation of the common law
is to be strictly construed does not apply to the Utah Code.
(2)  A statute of the Utah Code establishes the law of this state respecting
the subjects to which the statute relates.
(3)  Each provision of, and each proceeding under, the Utah Code shall be
construed with a view to effect the objects of the provision and to promote
justice.
(4)  When there is a conflict between the rules of equity and the rules of
common law in reference to the same matter, the rules of equity prevail.
